Hawaii statutes.
§121-17 Resignations. Resignations of
officers and warrant officers shall be in writing addressed to the adjutant
general and shall state the reasons for the resignation. Resignations shall be
transmitted through immediate commanding officers, who shall make indorsements
thereon, and shall take effect when accepted by the adjutant general and
announced in orders. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-17]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next